Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 4. Formation of New Provisional Parties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 148 to 153.

§ 22-4-401.
Application of article.

This article is applicable only to provisional parties.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-4-402.
Petition; form; validity.

Any group of persons desiring to form a new political party within this state shall file a petition with the secretary of state not later than June 1 in any general election year in which the party seeks to qualify for the general election ballot.

The petition shall be approved by the secretary of state prior to circulation and shall conform in substance to the following:

PETITION FOR FORMATIONOF A POLITICAL PARTY I know the contents of this petition including the names of the provisional party officers and request that the party be printed on the ballot for the next general election. I am a registered elector for the next primary and general election. (This statement shall appear at the head of each petition page.) PROVISIONAL PARTY OFFICERSNAME ADDRESS CHAIRPERSON TREASURER PETITIONERS (Signature) (Printed Name) (Residence) (Date) 1. 2. VERIFICATION BY CIRCULATORS I, , do hereby certify that I am a circulator of this petition, and I solely and personally circulated this petition, that all the signatures appearing herein were made in my presence from (month) (day), (year) through (month) (day), (year), and to the best of my knowledge and belief such signatures are those of the persons whose names they purport to be. (signature) (residence address)

Click to view

The name of the party printed on the petition shall consist of not more than two (2) words and shall not be identical to, nor similar to, the name of any existing qualified political party as determined by the secretary of state, nor to the word “independent”.

To be valid, a petition shall contain the names and signatures of registered electors equal in number to not less than two percent (2%) of the total number of votes cast for the office of United States house of representatives in the last general election.

The petition shall be circulated no earlier than April 1 of the year preceding the general election.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-4-201

; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 3; 1997, ch. 37, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted "representatives" for "representative."

Independent candidate and new political party failed to show likelihood of success

on merits in challenge to statutory signature and deadline requirements. See Populist Party v. Herschler, 746 F.2d 656, 1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 17718 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1984).

§ 22-4-403.
Circulation of petition; requirements.

Copies of the petition may be circulated for signatures, but each separate page shall contain the information required to be contained in the original petition. An elector signing the petition shall also list his name, residence and the date after his signature, as provided on the petition form in W.S. 22-4-402(b).

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-4-202

; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

22-4-202

, effective July 1, 1991.

§ 22-4-404.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 40, § 1, related to signing more than one petition to form a new political party.

§ 22-4-405.
Verification of signatures on petition.

The secretary of state shall determine from the official list of registered electors whether sufficient valid signatures have been obtained on petitions filed with the secretary of state’s office.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 22-4-204; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former § 22-4-204, effective July 1, 1991.

§ 22-4-406.
Officers and nominating procedures.

A provisional party shall be subject to W.S.

22-4-302

through

22-4-307

. Under no circumstances shall a provisional party nominate by the primary election process.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.